Utah statutes.
78B-13-316.   Role of law enforcement.

At the request of a prosecutor or the attorney general acting under Section 78B-13-315 a law enforcement officer may take any lawful action reasonably necessary to locate a child or a party and assist a prosecutor or attorney general with responsibilities under Section 78B-13-315.

